th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า > ช้อนใส่รองเท้าและอุปกรณ์ช่วยแต่งตัว: เครื่องช่วยแต่งตัว; ช้อนรองเท้า
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Pomůcky pro péči o obuv > Nazouvací lžíce: Pomůcky pro oblékání; Lžíce na boty
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleie og -verktøy > Skojern og påkledningshjelp: Hjelpemidler for påkledning; Skohorn
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoenverzorging > Schoenlepels: Hulpmiddelen voor aantrekken; Standaard schoenlepels
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleje og redskaber > Skohorn og påklædningshjælpemidler: Påklædningshjælpemidler; Skohorn
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 靴のお手入れ > 靴べら・ドレッシングエイド: ドレッシングエイド; 靴べら
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Cura delle scarpe > Calzascarpe e ausili per vestirsi: Ausili per vestirsi; Calzascarpe
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 鞋子保養工具 > 鞋拔和穿衣輔助器: 穿衣輔助器; 鞋拔
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 鞋类保养/工具 > 鞋拔/穿衣辅助用品: 穿衣辅助用品; 鞋拔
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Utensílios e cuidado de calçado > Calçadeiras e auxiliares para calçar: Auxiliares para vestir; Calçadeiras
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Товары для ухода за обувью > Рожки для обуви и приспособления для надевания: Приспособления для надевания обуви; Рожки для обуви
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures > Chausse-pieds et aide à l’habillage: Aides à l’habillage; Chausse-pieds
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày > Gậy hỗ trợ mặc áo và sừng giúp cởi giày: Gậy hỗ trợ mặc áo; Sừng giúp cởi giày
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai > Batų šaukštai ir pagalbinės apsiavimo priemonės: Pagalbinės apsiavimo priemonės; Batų šaukštai
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Cuidado del calzado > Calzadores: Ayudas para vestirse; Calzador
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Skovård och skoverktyg > Skohorn och påklädningshjälpmedel: Påklädningshjälpmedel; Skohorn
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri > Keratalar ve Giyim Yardımcıları: Giyim Yardımcıları; Keratalar
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos > Calçadeiras: Auxiliares para calçar; Calçadeira
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia > Łyżki do butów i pomoce do ubierania: Pomoce do ubierania; Łyżki do butów
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Shoe Care & Tools > Shoe Horns & Dressing Aids: Dressing Aids; Shoe Horns
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Kenkien hoito ja välineet > Kenkälusikat ja pukeutumisen apuvälineet: Pukeutumisen apuvälineet; Kenkälusikat
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Njega cipela i dodaci > Žlice za cipele i pomagala za oblačenje: Pomagala za oblačenje; Žlice za cipele
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Nega obutve in orodja > Žlice za čevlje in pripomočki za obuvanje: Pripomočki za oblačenje; Žlice za čevlje
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei > Încălțătoare și accesorii pentru încălțat: Accesorii pentru încălțat; Încălțătoare
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Cipőápolás és -eszközök > Cipőkanalak és öltözködési segédeszközök: Öltözködési segédeszközök; Cipőkanalak
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 신발 관리 도구 > 신발 주걱/착복용품: 착복용품; 신발 주걱
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων > Κουτάλια υποδημάτων & βοηθήματα ένδυσης: Βοηθήματα ένδυσης; Κουτάλια υποδημάτων
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv > Obuváky a pomôcky pri obliekaní: Pomôcky pri obliekaní; Obuváky
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Schuhpflege > Schuhanzieher: Anziehhilfen; Schuhlöffel
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Грижа за обувки и пособия > Обувалки и помощни средства за обличане: Помощни средства за обличане; Обувалки